Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-33] Standards for transporters.
The director may establish by rule standards applicable to transporters of
hazardous waste identified or listed under this chapter including, but not
limited to, requirements regarding:

(1) Obtaining an identification number;

(2) Labeling practices;

(3) Transporting hazardous waste;

(4) Requiring action, including cleanup, if hazardous
waste is discharged in transit;

(5) Using the manifest properly; and

(6) Submitting reports and recordkeeping practices.
[L 1989, c 212, pt of §5]

Cross References

Transportation of hazardous materials, see §§286-221 to 227.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next